Hawaii statutes.
§352-17 Compensation in facilities.
The director may provide, in accordance with rules and regulations adopted by
the director, for the payment of compensation, which shall not be considered as
wages, for work performed by a person placed in a youth correctional facility
while in such facility and not participating in a work release plan under
section 352-16. The compensation shall be credited to the account of
such person. [L 1980, c 303, pt of §8(1)]

Previous
Vol07_Ch0346-0398
Next